Indiana, session 2026, HB1285.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 7.1-5-7-5.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.10-2010,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.1. (a) A permittee in a criminal prosecution or
in a proceeding before the commission or a local board based upon a
charge of unlawfully furnishing an alcoholic beverage or a product
containing tetrahydrocannabinol to a minor may offer either or both
of the following proofs as a defense or defenses to the prosecution or
proceeding:
(1) That:
(A) the purchaser:
(i) falsely represented the purchaser's age in a written
statement, such as that prescribed by subsection (b),
supported by two (2) forms of identification showing the
purchaser to be at least twenty-one (21) years of age;
(ii) produced a driver's license bearing the purchaser's
photograph;
(iii) produced a photographic identification card, issued
2026 IN 1285—LS 6775/DI 106


under IC 9-24-16-1 or a similar card, issued under the laws
of another state or the federal government, showing that the
purchaser was of legal age to make the purchase; or
(iv) produced a government issued document bearing the
purchaser's photograph and showing the purchaser to be at
least twenty-one (21) years of age;
(B) the appearance of the purchaser was such that an ordinary
prudent person would believe the purchaser to be of legal age
to make the purchase; and
(C) the sale was made in good faith based upon the reasonable
belief that the purchaser was actually of legal age to make the
purchase.
(2) That the permittee or the permittee's agent had taken all
reasonable precautions in instructing the permittee's employees,
in hiring the permittee's employees, and in supervising them as to
sale of alcoholic beverages or products containing
tetrahydrocannabinol to minors.
(b) The following written statement is sufficient for the purposes of
subsection (a)(1)(A)(i):
REPRESENTATION AND STATEMENT
OF AGE
FOR PURCHASE OF ALCOHOLIC
BEVERAGES OR PRODUCTS CONTAINING THC
I understand that misrepresentation of age to induce the sale,
service, or delivery of alcoholic beverages or products containing
tetrahydrocannabinol to me is cause for my arrest and prosecution,
which can result in punishment as follows:
(1) Possible payment of a fine of up to $500.
(2) Possible imprisonment for up to 60 days.
(3) Possible loss or deferment of driver's license privileges for up
to one year.
(4) Possible requirement to participate in an alcohol education or
treatment program.
Knowing the possible penalties for misstatement, I hereby
represent and state, for the purpose of inducing _______________
(Name of licensee)
to sell, serve, or deliver alcoholic beverages or products containing
tetrahydrocannabinol to me, that I was born:
________, ________, ______ and am ____ years of age.
(Month) (Day) (Year)
Date __________ Signed ____________________
Address ___________________
2026 IN 1285—LS 6775/DI 106


__________________________
Other Identification Signature of person
Presented: who witnessed completion
Nonphoto driver's of this statement
license: (number & state) by patron:
________________________ __________________________
Social Security Number
__________________________
Other _____________________
__________________________
__________________________
SECTION 2. IC 7.1-5-7-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.159-2014,
SECTION 49, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Subject to IC 7.1-5-1-6.5, it is a Class C
misdemeanor for a minor to knowingly:
(1) possess an alcoholic beverage or a product containing
tetrahydrocannabinol;
(2) consume an alcoholic beverage or a product containing
tetrahydrocannabinol; or
(3) transport an alcoholic beverage or a product containing
tetrahydrocannabinol on a public highway when not
accompanied by at least one (1) of the minor's parents or
guardians.
(b) If a minor is found to have violated subsection (a)(2) or (a)(3)
while operating a vehicle, the court may order the minor's driving
privileges suspended for up to one (1) year. However, if the minor is
less than eighteen (18) years of age, the court shall order the minor's
driving privileges suspended for at least sixty (60) days.
(c) The court shall deliver any order suspending a minor's driving
privileges under this section to the bureau of motor vehicles, which
shall suspend the minor's driving privileges under IC 9-24-18-12.2 for
the period ordered by the court.
SECTION 3. IC 7.1-5-7-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.32-2019,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) It is a Class B misdemeanor for a person to
recklessly, knowingly, or intentionally sell, barter, exchange, provide,
or furnish an alcoholic beverage or a product containing
tetrahydrocannabinol to a minor.
(b) However, the offense described in subsection (a) is:
(1) a Class A misdemeanor if the person has a prior unrelated
conviction under this section; and
(2) a Level 6 felony if the consumption, ingestion, or use of the
2026 IN 1285—LS 6775/DI 106


alcoholic beverage or product containing
tetrahydrocannabinol is the proximate cause of the serious
bodily injury or death of any person.
(c) A person who knowingly or intentionally:
(1) rents property; or
(2) provides or arranges for the use of property;
for the purpose of allowing or enabling a minor to consume an
alcoholic beverage or a product containing tetrahydrocannabinol
on the property commits a Class C infraction. However, the violation
is a Class B misdemeanor if the person has a prior unrelated
adjudication or conviction for a violation of this section within the
previous five (5) years.
(d) This section shall not be construed to impose civil liability upon
any postsecondary educational institution, including public and private
universities and colleges, business schools, vocational schools, and
schools for continuing education, or its agents for injury to any person
or property sustained in consequence of a violation of this section
unless the institution or its agent:
(1) sells, barters, exchanges, provides, or furnishes an alcoholic
beverage or a product containing tetrahydrocannabinol to a
minor; or
(2) either:
(A) rents property; or
(B) provides or arranges for the use of property;
for the purpose of allowing or enabling a minor to consume an
alcoholic beverage or a product containing
tetrahydrocannabinol on the property.
SECTION 4. IC 9-24-18-12.2, AS ADDED BY P.L.159-2014,
SECTION 104, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12.2. Upon receipt of a court order
under IC 7.1-5-7-7 (minor consuming or transporting alcohol or a
product containing tetrahydrocannabinol), the bureau shall suspend
the minor's driving privileges for the period ordered by the court. If the
court fails to recommend a fixed term of suspension, or recommends
a fixed term that is less than the minimum term required by statute, the
bureau shall impose the minimum period of suspension required under
IC 7.1-5-7.
SECTION 5. IC 15-15-13-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2019,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "hemp" means the plant
Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, including the seeds
thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts,
2026 IN 1285—LS 6775/DI 106


and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with a
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol total tetrahydrocannabinol (THC)
concentration (including THCA) of not more than three-tenths of one
percent (0.3%) on a dry weight basis, for any part of the Cannabis
sativa L. plant.
SECTION 6. IC 15-15-13-6.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 104, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. As used in this chapter, "hemp
product" means a product derived from, or made by, processing hemp
plants or plant parts including derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids,
isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers. However, the term does not
include:
(1) smokable hemp (as defined by IC 35-48-1.1-38); or
(2) products that contain a total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol
tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) concentration (including THCA)
of more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) by weight.
SECTION 7. IC 15-15-13-6.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.7. As used in this chapter,
"pre-2026 hemp" means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part
of that plant, including the seeds thereof and all derivatives,
extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers,
whether growing or not, with a delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol
concentration of not more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%)
on a dry weight basis, for any part of the Cannabis sativa L. plant.
SECTION 8. IC 15-15-13-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2019,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Subject to section 15 of this chapter, the:
(1) production of, possession of, scientific study of, and
commerce in hemp; and
(2) possession, processing, and scientific study of pre-2026
hemp by a pre-2026 manufacturer (as defined in IC 24-4-21-1)
in accordance with IC 24-4-21;
is authorized in Indiana. Hemp is subject to regulation by the state seed
commissioner. The state seed commissioner shall adopt rules to
oversee the licensing, production, and management of (1) hemp and (2)
agricultural hemp seed. The state seed commissioner may also adopt
rules to oversee a pre-2026 manufacturer. This section does not
authorize the growing or production of pre-2026 hemp.
(b) All growers and handlers must have a hemp license issued by
the state seed commissioner. Growers and handlers engaged in the
production of agricultural hemp seed must also have an agricultural
2026 IN 1285—LS 6775/DI 106


hemp seed production license.
(c) An application for a hemp license or agricultural hemp seed
production license must include the following:
(1) The name and address of the applicant.
(2) The name and address of the hemp operation of the applicant.
(3) The global positioning system coordinates and legal
description of the property used for the hemp operation.
(4) If the hemp license or agricultural hemp seed production
license application is made by a grower, the acreage size of the
field where the hemp will be grown.
(5) A statement signed by the applicant, under penalty of perjury,
that the person applying for the hemp license or agricultural hemp
seed production license has not been convicted of a drug related
felony or misdemeanor in the previous ten (10) years.
(6) A written consent allowing the state police department to
conduct a state or national criminal history background check.
(7) A written consent allowing the state police department, the
state seed commissioner, or the state seed commissioner's
authorized representative, if a license is issued to the applicant, to
conduct aerial inspections and to enter the premises on which the
hemp is grown to conduct physical inspections of hemp planted
and grown by the applicant, and to ensure the plants meet the
definition of hemp as set forth in section 6 of this chapter.
(8) A nonrefundable application fee, which must include the
amount necessary to conduct a state or national criminal history
background check, in an amount determined by the state seed
commissioner.
(9) Any other information required by the state seed
commissioner.
SECTION 9. IC 15-15-13-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2019,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) An agricultural hemp seed production
license issued under this chapter authorizes a grower or handler to
produce and handle agricultural hemp seed for sale to licensed hemp
growers and handlers. A seller of agricultural hemp seed shall ensure
that the seed complies with any standards set by the state seed
commissioner. The state seed commissioner shall make available to
growers information that identifies sellers of agricultural hemp seed.
(b) A person who sells agricultural hemp seed to a grower must be
a seed distributor who has a permit under IC 15-15-1-34.
(c) All growers and handlers must keep records in accordance with
rules adopted by the state seed commissioner. Upon at least three (3)
2026 IN 1285—LS 6775/DI 106


days notice, the state seed commissioner may audit the required records
during normal business hours. The state seed commissioner may
conduct an audit for the purpose of ensuring compliance with:
(1) this chapter;
(2) rules adopted by the state seed commissioner; or
(3) hemp license or agricultural hemp seed production license
requirements, terms, and conditions.
(d) In addition to an audit conducted in accordance with subsection
(c), the state seed commissioner may inspect independently, or in
cooperation with the state police department, a federal law enforcement
agency, or a local law enforcement agency, any hemp crop during the
crop's growth phase and take a representative composite sample for
field analysis. If a crop contains an average
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol total tetrahydrocannabinol (THC)
concentration (including THCA) exceeding three-tenths of one percent
(0.3%) on a dry weight basis, the state seed commissioner may detain,
seize, or embargo the crop.
(e) The state seed commissioner may revoke a license issued under
this chapter to a person that fails to cooperate with:
(1) the state seed commissioner;
(2) the state police;
(3) a federal law enforcement agency; or
(4) a local law enforcement agency;
in an inspection, or in the taking of a sample, under subsection (d).
(f) A failure to cooperate described in subsection (e) constitutes
probable cause for the state seed commissioner, state police, federal
law enforcement agency, or local law enforcement agency to search the
premises of the licensee's hemp operation.
(g) If the state police department, a federal law enforcement agency,
or a local law enforcement agency cooperates with the state seed
commissioner in the detention, seizure, or embargo of a crop under this
section:
(1) the state police department, federal law enforcement agency,
or local law enforcement agency; and
(2) any officer or employee of the state police department, federal
law enforcement agency, or local law enforcement agency who is
involved in the detention, seizure, or embargo;
is immune from civil liability for the detention, seizure, or embargo.
(h) The state seed commissioner may order a hemp crop that is
detained, seized, or embargoed for noncompliance with this chapter to
be destroyed by the owner. However, except as prohibited by federal
law, the grower may appeal to the state seed commissioner for the
2026 IN 1285—LS 6775/DI 106


hemp crop to be diverted to a willing licensed processor for processing
and sale for industrial use. A hemp crop that is detained, seized, or
embargoed may not be used for cannabidiol, other extracts, oil, food,
or cosmetic products that are used for humans or animals.
(i) A grower shall reimburse the state seed commissioner for the
cost of testing conducted on the grower's crop under this section.
SECTION 10. IC 15-15-13-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.156-2020,
SECTION 63, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. The state seed commissioner is responsible for
the following:
(1) Monitoring the hemp grown by any license holder.
(2) Conducting random testing of the hemp for compliance with
tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) levels, including THCA. The state
seed commissioner may enter into agreements with one (1) or
more laboratories selected by the Indiana state police department
to perform testing under this subdivision.
(3) Establishing necessary testing criteria and protocols, including
a procedure for testing, using post decarboxylation or other
similarly reliable methods, for delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol total
tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) concentration levels, including
THCA, of the hemp produced.
(4) Establishing the minimum number of acres to be planted
under each license issued under this chapter.
(5) Regulating any propagative material of a hemp plant.
SECTION 11. IC 24-4-21-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 131, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The following definitions apply
throughout this chapter:
(1) "Certificate of analysis" means a certificate from an
independent testing laboratory describing the results of the
laboratory's testing of a sample.
(2) "Independent testing laboratory" means a laboratory:
(A) with respect to which no person having a direct or indirect
interest in the laboratory also has a direct or indirect interest
in a facility that:
(i) processes, distributes, or sells low THC hemp extract, or
a substantially similar substance in another jurisdiction;
(ii) cultivates, processes, distributes, dispenses, or sells
marijuana; or
(iii) cultivates, processes, or distributes hemp; and
(B) that is accredited as a testing laboratory to International
Organization for Standardization (ISO) 17025 by a third party
2026 IN 1285—LS 6775/DI 106


accrediting body such as the American Association for
Laboratory Accreditation (A2LA) or Assured Calibration and
Laboratory Accreditation Select Services (ACLASS).
(3) "Low THC hemp extract" has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-48-1.1-27.
(4) "Pre-2026 low THC hemp extract" means a substance or
compound that:
(A) is derived from or contains any part of the plant
Cannabis sativa L. that meets the definition of hemp under
IC 15-15-13-6;
(B) contains not more than three-tenths percent (0.3%)
total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), including
precursors, by dry weight; and
(C) contains no other controlled substances.
The term does not include smokable hemp, or the harvested
reproductive organ, whether immature or mature, of the
female hemp plant.
(5) "Pre-2026 manufacturer" means a person that:
(A) manufactured or processed pre-2026 low THC hemp
extract before January 1, 2026; and
(B) has been in continuous operation as a manufacturer or
processor since January 1, 2026.
SECTION 12. IC 24-4-21-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2019,
SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. A person may distribute low THC hemp extract
in Indiana only if the distributor has a certificate of analysis prepared
by an independent testing laboratory showing:
(1) that the low THC hemp extract is the product of a batch tested
by the independent testing laboratory;
(2) that the independent testing laboratory determined that the
batch contained not more than three-tenths percent (0.3%) total
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), including precursors, by
weight, meets the requirements of IC 35-48-1.1-27(a)(1)
through IC 35-48-1.1-27(a)(4), based on the testing of a random
sample of the batch; and
(3) the cannabidiol percent present of the low THC hemp extract.
SECTION 13. IC 24-4-21-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. (a) This section applies only
to a pre-2026 manufacturer.
(b) A pre-2026 manufacturer may continue to manufacture or
process pre-2026 low THC hemp extract in Indiana under the same
2026 IN 1285—LS 6775/DI 106


terms and conditions that applied to the manufacturer on
December 31, 2025.
(c) A pre-2026 manufacturer:
(1) may distribute pre-2026 low THC hemp extract to a
manufacturer, processor, distributor, or retailer in another
jurisdiction, if receipt of pre-2026 low THC hemp extract by
that person is lawful in that jurisdiction; and
(2) may not distribute pre-2026 low THC hemp extract to any
person in Indiana, unless the distribution is required by law,
including for purposes of testing or analysis.
(d) A person may possess pre-2026 low THC hemp extract for
purposes authorized under subsection (c)(2).
(e) Nothing in this section authorizes a retailer to possess or sell
pre-2026 low THC hemp extract.
SECTION 14. IC 24-4-21-4, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), Low
THC hemp extract must be distributed in packaging that contains the
following information:
(1) A scannable bar code or QR code linked to a document that
contains information with respect to the manufacture of the low
THC hemp extract, including the:
(A) batch identification number;
(B) product name;
(C) batch date;
(D) expiration date, which must be not more than two (2) years
from the date of manufacture;
(E) batch size;
(F) total quantity produced;
(G) ingredients used, including the:
(i) ingredient name;
(ii) name of the company that manufactured the ingredient;
(iii) company or product identification number or code, if
applicable; and
(iv) ingredient lot number; and
(H) download link for a certificate of analysis for the low THC
hemp extract.
(2) The batch number.
(3) The Internet address of a web site website to obtain batch
information.
(4) The expiration date.
2026 IN 1285—LS 6775/DI 106


(5) The number of milligrams of low THC hemp extract.
(6) The manufacturer.
(7) The fact A statement that the product contains not more than
three-tenths percent (0.3%) total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol
(THC), including precursors, by weight. meets the requirements
of IC 35-48-1.1-27.
(b) Before July 1, 2018, low THC hemp extract may be distributed
in Indiana without having met the requirements described in subsection
(a).
SECTION 15. IC 24-4-21-4.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. (a) This section applies only
to pre-2026 low THC hemp extract.
(b) Pre-2026 low THC hemp extract that is being transported
within Indiana for delivery to another jurisdiction must be
transported in a sealed container that is clearly and prominently
labeled with a notice stating: "This product may not be delivered
or sold to a person in Indiana".
(c) Pre-2026 low THC hemp extract must be distributed in
packaging that contains the following information:
(1) A scannable bar code or QR code linked to a document
that contains information with respect to the manufacture of
the pre-2026 low THC hemp extract, including the:
(A) batch identification number;
(B) product name;
(C) batch date;
(D) expiration date, which must be not more than two (2)
years from the date of manufacture;
(E) batch size;
(F) total quantity produced;
(G) ingredients used, including the:
(i) ingredient name;
(ii) name of the company that manufactured the
ingredient;
(iii) company or product identification number or code,
if applicable; and
(iv) ingredient lot number; and
(H) download link for a certificate of analysis for the
pre-2026 low THC hemp extract.
(2) The batch number.
(3) The Internet address of a website to obtain batch
information.
2026 IN 1285—LS 6775/DI 106


(4) The expiration date.
(5) The number of milligrams of pre-2026 low THC hemp
extract.
(6) The manufacturer.
(7) A statement that the product contains not more than
t hr e e- t e nt hs pe r c e nt ( 0. 3 % ) t o t a l
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), including precursors, by
weight.
SECTION 16. IC 34-30-2.1-71, AS ADDED BY P.L.105-2022,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 71. IC 7.1-5-7-8 (Concerning postsecondary
educational institutions for alcohol related injuries and or
tetrahydrocannabinol product related injuries).
SECTION 17. IC 35-31.5-2-58.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 58.5. "Consumable hemp
substance", for purposes of IC 35-48-1.1, has the meaning set forth
in IC 35-48-1.1-6.5.
SECTION 18. IC 35-31.5-2-61.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 61.5. "Container", for purposes
of IC 35-48-1.1, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-48-1.1-6.7.
SECTION 19. IC 35-46-1-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 242, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) A person at least eighteen
(18) years of age who knowingly or intentionally encourages, aids,
induces, or causes a child to commit an act of delinquency (as defined
by IC 31-37-1 or IC 31-37-2) commits contributing to delinquency, a
Class A misdemeanor, except as provided in subsections (b) through
(e).
(b) If the delinquent act described in subsection (a) would be a
felony if committed by an adult, the offense described in subsection (a)
is a felony of the same level as the delinquent act would be if
committed by an adult.
(c) The offense described in subsection (a) is a Level 5 felony if:
(1) the person committing the offense is at least twenty-one (21)
years of age and knowingly or intentionally furnishes:
(A) an alcoholic beverage or a product containing
tetrahydrocannabinol to a child in violation of IC 7.1-5-7-8
when the person committing the offense knew or reasonably
should have known that the person furnished the alcoholic
beverage was a child; or
2026 IN 1285—LS 6775/DI 106


(B) a controlled substance (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-7) or a
drug (as defined in IC 9-13-2-49.1) in violation of Indiana law;
and
(2) the consumption, ingestion, or use of the alcoholic beverage,
controlled substance, or drug is the proximate cause of the death
of any person.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (c), the offense described in
subsection (a) is a Level 6 felony if:
(1) the person committing the offense is at least twenty-one (21)
years of age;
(2) the child who commits the delinquent act is less than sixteen
(16) years of age; and
(3) the act would be a misdemeanor if committed by an adult.
(e) If the person who commits the offense described in subsection
(a) is at least twenty-one (21) years of age, and the child who commits
the delinquent act is less than sixteen (16) years of age, the offense is:
(1) a Level 5 felony if the delinquent act would be a Level 6
felony if committed by an adult;
(2) a Level 4 felony if the delinquent act would be a Level 5
felony if committed by an adult;
(3) a Level 3 felony if the delinquent act would be a Level 4
felony if committed by an adult;
(4) a Level 2 felony if the delinquent act would be a Level 3
felony if committed by an adult;
(5) a Level 1 felony if the delinquent act would be a Level 1 or 2
felony if committed by an adult; or
(6) punishable under IC 35-50-2-3(a) (penalty for murder) if the
delinquent act would be murder if committed by an adult.
SECTION 20. IC 35-46-1-10.1, AS ADDED BY P.L.94-2008,
SECTION 61, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.1. (a) If a permit holder or an agent or
employee of a permit holder violates IC 7.1-5-7-8 on the licensed
premises, in addition to any other penalty, a civil judgment may be
imposed against the permit holder as follows:
(1) If the licensed premises at that specific business location has
not been issued a citation or summons for a violation of
IC 7.1-5-7-8 in the previous one hundred eighty (180) days, a civil
penalty of up to two hundred dollars ($200).
(2) If the licensed premises at that specific business location has
had one (1) citation or summons for a violation of IC 7.1-5-7-8 in
the previous one hundred eighty (180) days, a civil penalty of up
to four hundred dollars ($400).
2026 IN 1285—LS 6775/DI 106


(3) If the licensed premises at that specific business location has
had two (2) citations or summonses for a violation of IC 7.1-5-7-8
in the previous one hundred eighty (180) days, a civil penalty of
up to seven hundred dollars ($700).
(4) If the licensed premises at that specific business location has
had three (3) or more citations or summonses for a violation of
IC 7.1-5-7-8 in the previous one hundred eighty (180) days, a civil
penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(b) The defenses set forth in IC 7.1-5-7-5.1 are available to a permit
holder in an action under this section.
(c) Unless a person less than twenty-one (21) years of age buys or
receives an alcoholic beverage under the direction of a law
enforcement officer as part of an enforcement action, a permit holder
that sells alcoholic beverages or a product containing
tetrahydrocannabinol is not liable under this section unless the
person less than twenty-one (21) years of age who bought or received
the alcoholic beverage or product containing tetrahydrocannabinol
is charged for violating IC 7.1-5-7-7.
(d) All civil penalties collected under this section shall be deposited
in the alcohol and tobacco commission's enforcement and
administration fund under IC 7.1-4-10.
SECTION 21. IC 35-48-1.1-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. "Consumable hemp
substance" means a substance derived from hemp that is intended
to be introduced into a person's body.
SECTION 22. IC 35-48-1.1-6.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.7. "Container" means the
innermost wrapping, packaging, vessel, or cartridge in direct
contact with a consumable hemp substance intended for retail sale
to a consumer. The term does not include bulk shipping containers
or outer wrappings that are not essential for the final retail
delivery to a consumer.
SECTION 23. IC 35-48-1.1-27, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 249, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 27. (a) "Low THC hemp extract"
means a substance or compound that:
(1) is derived from or contains any part of the plant Cannabis
sativa L. that meets the definition of hemp under IC 15-15-13-6;
(2) contains not more than three-tenths percent (0.3%), total
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol in aggregate:
2026 IN 1285—LS 6775/DI 106


(A) total tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), including THCA
and any other precursors; and
(B) any other cannabinoids that have similar effects (or are
marketed to have similar effects) on humans or animals as
THC;
by dry weight; and
(3) does not contain a cannabinoid:
(A) that is not capable of being naturally produced by the
Cannabis sativa L. plant; or
(B) that:
(i) is capable of being naturally produced by the
Cannabis sativa L. plant; and
(ii) was synthesized or manufactured outside the plant;
(3) (4) contains no other controlled substances; and
(5) is not sold or delivered in a container that contains, in
aggregate, more than four-tenths (0.4) of a milligram of:
(A) total tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), including THCA
and any other precursors; and
(B) any other cannabinoids that have similar effects (or are
marketed to have similar effects) on humans or animals as
THC.
(b) The term does not include:
(1) the harvested reproductive organ, whether immature or
mature, of the female hemp plant; or
(2) smokable hemp.
SECTION 24. IC 35-48-1.1-38, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 249, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 38. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b), "smokable hemp" means a product containing not more
than three-tenths percent (0.3%) delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol total
tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), including THCA and any other
precursors and derivatives of THC, in a form that allows THC to be
introduced into the human body by inhalation of smoke. The term
includes:
(1) hemp bud; and
(2) hemp flower.
(b) The term does not include:
(1) a hemp plant that is; or
(2) parts of a hemp plant that are;
grown or handled by a licensee for processing or manufacturing into a
legal hemp product.
SECTION 25. IC 35-52-7-39, AS ADDED BY P.L.169-2014,
2026 IN 1285—LS 6775/DI 106


SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 39. IC 7.1-5-7-7 defines a crime concerning
alcohol and products containing tetrahydrocannabinol.
SECTION 26. IC 35-52-7-40, AS ADDED BY P.L.169-2014,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS: Sec. 40.
IC 7.1-5-7-8 defines a crime concerning alcohol and products
containing tetrahydrocannabinol.
2026 IN 1285—LS 6775/DI 106